fr: Matériau de la sangle Dayan: Coton; Cuir; Nylon; Polyester; Cuir brut; Cuir synthétique (PU); Autre
pl: Materiał paska dayanu: Bawełna; Skóra; Nylon; Poliester; Niewyprawiona skóra; Skóra syntetyczna (PU); Inne
vi: Chất liệu dây buộc trống Dayan: Cotton; Da; Nilon; Polyester; Da chưa thuộc; Da tổng hợp (PU); Khác
nb: Materiale i dayan-stropp: Bomull; Skinn; Nylon; Polyester; Råhud; Syntetisk skinn (PU); Annet
pt-BR: Material da tira do dayan: Algodão; Couro; Nylon; Poliéster; Couro cru; Couro sintético (PU); Outro
it: Materiale del cinturino del dayan: Cotone; Pelle; Nylon; Poliestere; Cuoio grezzo; Ecopelle (PU); Altro
tr: Dayan askı malzemesi: Pamuk; Deri; Naylon; Polyester; Ham deri; Sentetik deri (PU); Diğer
nl: Materiaal dayan-spanbanden: Katoen; Leer; Nylon; Polyester; Ongelooid leer; Synthetisch leer (PU); Overige
th: วัสดุสายรัดของกลองดายัน: ฝ้าย; หนัง; ไนลอน; โพลีเอสเตอร์; หนังดิบ; หนังสังเคราะห์ (PU); อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Материал на ленитите за даян: Памук; Кожа; Найлон; Полиестер; Необработена кожа; Синтетична кожа (PU); Други
hr-HR: Materijal remena dajana: Pamuk; Koža; Najlon; Poliester; Sirova koža; Sintetička koža (PU); Ostalo
ja: ダヤンストラップ素材: コットン; レザー; ナイロン; ポリエステル; 生皮; 合成皮革 (PU); その他
fi: Dayan-rummun hihnan materiaali: Puuvilla; Nahka; Nailon; Polyesteri; Raakanahka; Synteettinen nahka (PU); Muu
en: Dayan strap material: Cotton; Leather; Nylon; Polyester; Rawhide; Synthetic leather (PU); Other
es: Material de la correa de la dahina: Algodón; Cuero; Nailon; Poliéster; Cuero crudo; Cuero sintético (PU); Otro
cs: Materiál řemínku Dayan: Bavlna; Kůže; Nylon; Polyester; Surová kůže; Syntetická kůže (PU); Jiné
hu: Dayan pánt anyaga: Pamut; Bőr; Nejlon; Poliészter; Nyersbőr; Szintetikus bőr (PU); Egyéb
da: Dayan-stropmateriale: Bomuld; Læder; Nylon; Polyester; Råhud; Syntetisk læder (PU); Andet
de: Material der Dayan-Riemen: Baumwolle; Leder; Nylon; Polyester; Rohhaut; Kunstleder (PU); Sonstige
el: Υλικό ιμάντα dayan: Βαμβάκι; Δέρμα; Νάιλον; Πολυεστέρας; Ακατέργαστο δέρμα; Συνθετικό δέρμα (PU); Άλλο
pt-PT: Material da alça do Dayan: Algodão; Couro; Nylon; Poliéster; Couro cru; Pele sintética (PU); Outro
ro-RO: Materialul curelei dayanului: Bumbac; Piele; Nailon; Poliester; Piele neargăsită; Piele sintetică (PU); Altele
ru: Материал ремня даяна: Хлопок; Кожа; Нейлон; Полиэстер; Сыромятная кожа; Искусственная кожа (ПУ); Другое
lt-LT: Dajanų dirželio medžiaga: Medvilnė; Oda; Nailonas; Poliesteris; Neišdirbta oda; Sintetinė oda (PU); Kita
zh-TW: 塔布拉鼓綁帶材質: 棉質; 皮革; 尼龍; 聚酯纖維; 生皮; 合成皮 (PU); 其他
sk-SK: Materiál remienka Dayan: Bavlna; Koža; Nylón; Polyester; Surová koža; Syntetická koža (PU); Iné
ko: 다얀 스트랩 소재: 면; 가죽; 나일론; 폴리에스터; 생가죽; 합성 가죽(PU); 기타
sl-SI: Material traku za dayan: Bombaž; Usnje; Najlon; Poliester; Surova koža; Sintetično usnje (PU); Drugo
sv: Dayan-remmens material: Bomull; Läder; Nylon; Polyester; Råhud; Syntetläder (PU); Övrigt
zh-CN: 达扬鼓背带材质: 棉; 皮革; 尼龙; 聚酯纤维; 生皮; 合成皮革 (PU); 其他